North Carolina, session 2025, SB830.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Title. – This act shall be known and may be cited as the Government
Modernization Act of 2026.
SECTION 2.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Many State agencies continue to operate with outdated legacy IT systems,
leading to inefficiencies in service delivery and data management.
(2) Cybersecurity threats pose a growing risk to public data, necessitating stronger
protections and advanced security measures.
(3) Blockchain technology presents an opportunity to enhance transparency,
reduce fraud, and streamline government transactions.
(4) Expanding online government services will improve accessibility for North
Carolina residents and businesses, reducing bureaucratic hurdles and
increasing operational efficiency.
SECTION 2.(b) Purpose. – The purpose of this act is to modernize North Carolina's
government operations by implementing advanced technological solutions to enhance efficiency,
security, and accessibility in public services.
SECTION 3.(a) Blockchain Integration. – The Department of Information
Technology (DIT), in consultation with the Department of Administration, shall study ways in
which integrating blockchain technology may contribute to the following outcomes:
(1) Greater security in maintaining records of transactions and contracts to which
the State is a party.
(2) Enhanced verification mechanisms for licenses, permits, and certifications.
(3) Greater transparency for procurement processes to reduce fraud and ensure
accountability.
(4) Any other benefits to the State.
SECTION 3.(b) No later than 12 months after this act becomes law, the DIT shall
submit a report of its findings to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information
Technology.
SECTION 4. Funding and Implementation. – Effective July 1, 2026, there is
appropriated from the Information Technology Reserve Fund to the Department of Information
Technology the sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year for implementation of this act. These funds are not subject to reversion
under the State Budget Act and will remain available until expended.
*S830-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. Reporting and Accountability. – The DIT shall submit an annual
progress report to the General Assembly detailing the implementation status, challenges, and
recommendations related to government modernization efforts. The Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Digital Governance shall be established to oversee implementation and ensure
compliance with this act.
SECTION 6. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and expires
June 30, 2031.
Page 2 Senate Bill 830-First Edition